Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 133
DISTRIBUTIONS

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see §§ 7-90-102 and 7-121-401.

Section

7-133-101. Distributions prohibited.

Except as authorized by section 7-133-102, a nonprofit corporation shall not make any distributions.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 719, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-133-102. Authorized distributions.

A nonprofit corporation may:

Make distributions of its income or assets to its members that are domestic or foreign nonprofit corporations;

Pay compensation in a reasonable amount to its members, directors, or officers for services rendered; and

Confer benefits upon its members in conformity with its purposes.

Nonprofit corporations may make distributions upon dissolution in conformity with article 134 of this title.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 719, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.